Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2259.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) Each board of education of a school district shall adopt
policies and procedures to govern the use of personal electronic
communication devices. Such policies and procedures shall:
(1) Prohibit students from using any personal electronic
communication device during the instructional hours of the school day;
and
(2) set forth disciplinary actions and consequences that may occur if a
student violates such policies and procedures.
(b) A school district's policies and procedures adopted pursuant to
this section may:
(1) Authorize a student to use a personal electronic communication
device during the instructional hours of a school day if the use is:
(A) Required for the implementation of a student's individualized
education program or 504 plan;
(B) authorized by a teacher or administrator for educational purposes,
except that such use shall not be authorized as part of a classroom reward
or free time;
(C) preapproved by an administrator or teacher on an individual
student basis due to health concerns, emergency concerns or other special
circumstances;
(D) authorized by an administrator or teacher for an event that occurs
outside of the school building during normal instructional hours such as a
field trip or activity; and
(2) prohibit students from using any personal electronic

HB 2259 2
communication device during lunch or passing periods.
(c) As used in this section, "privately owned electronic
communication device" means any wireless electronic communication
device that:
(1) Provides for voice, text or video communication between two or
more parties, including, but not limited to, a mobile or cellular phone,
tablet, computer, watch, text messaging device or personal digital
assistant; and
(2) is not owned or issued to students by the school district or school.
Sec. 2. (a) The state board of education shall designate a period of
time each school year as a time for social media awareness. The state
board of education shall develop age and developmentally-appropriate
objectives, materials and instructional goals for social media awareness.
Such objectives, materials and instructional goals shall be shared to each
board of education of a school district and governing authority of an
accredited nonpublic school.
(b) Each school of a school district shall include social media
awareness within the district's curriculum as deemed appropriate by the
district.
(c) The goals of social media awareness shall be to teach students
about:
(1) The risks of social media use, including, but not limited to, the
following:
(A) Social media addiction;
(B) exposure to various forms of misinformation;
(C) negative effects on mental health; and
(D) the permanent nature of content created or disseminated on social
media;
(2) how to safely use social media, including, but not limited to, the
following:
(A) Maintaining personal security and preventing oversharing of
personal information;
(B) identifying predatory behavior; and
(C) reporting suspicious behavior; and
(3) the advantages of social media use, including, but not limited to,
the following:
(A) Career and resume building for future academic or employment
opportunities;
(B) sharing information with family and friends; and
(C) safely connecting with other users with similar interests.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.